Illinois, session 104th, HB1250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 529-3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/29-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 29-3)7    Sec. 29-3. Transportation in school districts. School 8boards of community consolidated districts, community unit 9districts, consolidated districts, consolidated high school 10districts, optional elementary unit districts, combined high 11school - unit districts, combined school districts if the 12combined district includes any district which was previously 13required to provide transportation, and any newly created 14elementary or high school districts resulting from a high 15school - unit conversion, a unit to dual conversion, or a 16multi-unit conversion if the newly created district includes 17any area that was previously required to provide 18transportation shall provide free transportation for pupils 19residing at a distance of one and one-half miles or more from 20any school to which they are assigned for attendance 21maintained within the district, except for those pupils for 22whom the school board shall certify to the State Board of 23Education that adequate transportation for the public is   HB1250- 2 -LRB104 05862 LNS 15893 b1available.2    For the purpose of this Act 1 1/2 miles distance shall be 3from the exit of the property where the pupil resides to the 4point where pupils are normally unloaded at the school 5attended; such distance shall be measured by determining the 6shortest distance on normally traveled roads or streets.7    Such school board may comply with the provisions of this 8Section by providing free transportation for pupils to and 9from an assigned school and a pick-up point located not more 10than one and one-half miles from the home of each pupil 11assigned to such point.12    For the purposes of this Act "adequate transportation for 13the public" shall be assumed to exist for such pupils as can 14reach school by walking, one way, along normally traveled 15roads or streets less than 1 1/2 miles irrespective of the 16distance the pupil is transported by public transportation.17    In addition to the other requirements of this Section, 18each school board may provide free transportation for any 19pupil residing within a one-half mile 1 1/2 miles from the 20school attended where conditions are such that walking, either 21to or from the school to which a pupil is assigned for 22attendance or to or from a pick-up point or bus stop, 23constitutes a serious hazard to the safety of the pupil due to 24either (i) vehicular traffic or rail crossings or (ii) a 25course or pattern of criminal activity, as defined in Section 2610 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention   HB1250- 3 -LRB104 05862 LNS 15893 b1Act. Such transportation shall not be provided if adequate 2transportation for the public is available.3    The determination as to what constitutes a serious safety 4hazard shall be made by the school board, in accordance with 5guidelines promulgated by the Illinois Department of 6Transportation regarding vehicular traffic or rail crossings 7or in accordance with guidelines regarding a course or pattern 8of criminal activity, as determined by the local law 9enforcement agency, in consultation with the State 10Superintendent of Education. A school board, on written 11petition of the parent or guardian of a pupil for whom adequate 12transportation for the public is alleged not to exist because 13the pupil is required to walk along normally traveled roads or 14streets where walking is alleged to constitute a serious 15safety hazard due to either (i) vehicular traffic or rail 16crossings or (ii) a course or pattern of criminal activity, or 17who is required to walk between the pupil's home and assigned 18school or between the pupil's home or assigned school and a 19pick-up point or bus stop along roads or streets where walking 20is alleged to constitute a serious safety hazard due to either 21(i) vehicular traffic or rail crossings or (ii) a course or 22pattern of criminal activity, shall conduct a study and make 23findings, which the Department of Transportation, with respect 24to vehicular traffic or rail crossings, or the State Board of 25Education, in consultation with the local law enforcement 26agency, with respect to a course or pattern of criminal   HB1250- 4 -LRB104 05862 LNS 15893 b1activity, shall review and approve or disapprove as provided 2in this Section, to determine whether a serious safety hazard 3exists as alleged in the petition. The Department of 4Transportation shall review the findings of the school board 5concerning vehicular traffic or rail crossings and shall 6approve or disapprove the school board's determination that a 7serious safety hazard exists within 30 days after the school 8board submits its findings to the Department of 9Transportation. The State Board of Education, in consultation 10with the local law enforcement agency, shall review the 11findings of the school board concerning a course or pattern of 12criminal activity and shall approve or disapprove the school 13board's determination that a serious safety hazard exists 14within 30 days after the school board submits its findings to 15the State Board. The school board shall annually review the 16conditions and determine whether or not the hazardous 17conditions remain unchanged. The State Superintendent of 18Education may request that the Illinois Department of 19Transportation or the local law enforcement agency verify that 20the conditions have not changed. No action shall lie against 21the school board, the State Superintendent of Education, the 22Illinois Department of Transportation, the State Board of 23Education, or a local law enforcement agency for decisions 24made in accordance with this Section. The provisions of the 25Administrative Review Law and all amendments and modifications 26thereof and the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to   HB1250- 5 -LRB104 05862 LNS 15893 b1and govern all proceedings instituted for the judicial review 2of final administrative decisions of the Department of 3Transportation, the State Board of Education, or a local law 4enforcement agency under this Section. At all points, except 5when otherwise mentioned in this Section, the local 6enforcement agency is authorized to determine what constitutes 7a course or pattern of criminal activity. 8    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 9the 100th General Assembly do not apply to a school district 10organized under Article 34 of this Code. 11(Source: P.A. 100-1142, eff. 11-28-18.)